Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201271-4728
Commission; purpose; duties.

The commission shall serve as the principal state agency responsible
for monitoring public policies and implementing programs which shall improve
the quality and coordination of existing services for deaf or hard of hearing
persons and promote the development of new services when necessary. To perform
this function the commission shall:

(1) Inventory services available for meeting the problems of persons
with a hearing loss and assist such persons in locating and securing such
services;

(2) License interpreters under sections 20-150 to 20-159 and prepare
and maintain a roster of licensed interpreters. The roster shall include the
type of employment the interpreter generally engages in, the type of license
the interpreter holds, and the expiration date of the license. Each interpreter
included on the roster shall provide the commission with his or her social
security number which shall be kept confidential by the commission. The roster
shall be made available to local, state, and federal agencies and shall be
used for referrals to private organizations and individuals seeking interpreters;

(3) Promote the training of interpreters for deaf or hard of hearing
persons;

(4) Provide counseling to deaf or hard of hearing persons or refer such
persons to private or governmental agencies which provide counseling services;

(5) Conduct a voluntary census of deaf or hard of hearing persons in
Nebraska and compile a current registry;

(6) Promote expanded adult educational opportunities for deaf or hard
of hearing persons;

(7) Serve as an agency for the collection of information concerning
deaf or hard of hearing persons and for the dispensing of such information
to interested persons by collecting studies, compiling bibliographies, gathering
information, and conducting research with respect to the education, training,
counseling, placement, and social and economic adjustment of deaf or hard
of hearing persons and with respect to the causes, diagnosis, treatment, and
methods of prevention of impaired hearing;

(8) Appoint advisory or special committees when appropriate for indepth
investigations and study of particular problems and receive reports of findings
and recommendations;

(9) Assess and monitor programs for services to deaf or hard of hearing
persons and make recommendations to those state agencies providing such services
regarding changes necessary to improve the quality and coordination of the
services;

(10) Make recommendations to the Governor and the Legislature with respect
to modification in existing services or establishment of additional services
for deaf or hard of hearing persons.
The recommendations submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically;

(11) Promote awareness and understanding of the rights of deaf or hard
of hearing persons;

(12) Promote statewide communication services for deaf or hard of hearing
persons;

(13) Assist deaf or hard of hearing persons in accessing comprehensive
mental health, alcoholism, and drug abuse services;

(14) Provide licensed interpreters in public and private settings for
the benefit of deaf or hard of hearing persons, if private-practice licensed
interpreters are not available, and establish and collect reasonable fees
for such interpreter services;

(15) Make recommendations to the State Department of Education, public
school districts, and educational service units regarding policies and procedures
for qualified educational interpreter guidelines and a training program as
required in subsection (3) of section 20-150, including, but not limited to,
testing, training, and grievances; and

(16) Approve, conduct, and sponsor continuing education programs and
other activities to assess continuing competence of licensees. The commission
shall establish and charge reasonable fees for such activities. All fees collected
pursuant to this section by the commission shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit to the Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing Fund.
Such fees shall be disbursed for payment of expenses related to this section.

Laws 1979, LB 101, § 9;

Laws 1981, LB 250, § 5;

Laws 1987, LB 376, § 20;

Laws 1995, LB 25, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 851, § 18;

Laws 1999, LB 359, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 22, § 16;

Laws 2006, LB 87, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 117.
July 19, 2012
Telecommunications Relay System Act, see section 86-301.